Louisiana, session 2026, HB222.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1259.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1259.3. Medicaid coverage for dental procedures in certain circumstances
A. The Louisiana Medicaid program shall cover a dental procedure for a
Medicaid enrollee if the procedure is medically necessary in order for the patient to
be cleared to receive another Medicaid-covered medical procedure.
B. Pursuant to this Section, the secretary of the Louisiana Department of
Health shall do all of the following:
(1) Submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services all necessary
state plan amendments.
(2) Promulgate all necessary rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 222 ENROLLED
(3) Take any other actions as are necessary to implement the provisions of
this Section.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.